Maine, session 132, LD65.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §436-A, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2005, c. 330, §10, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
1. Coastal wetlands. "Coastal wetlands" has the same meaning as in section 480-B,
subsection 2.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §480-B, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2005, c. 330, §13, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
2. Coastal wetlands. "Coastal wetlands" means:
A. All areas with vegetation present that is tolerant of salt water and occurs primarily
in a saltwater or estuarine habitat; and
B. All tidal and subtidal lands and any swamp, marsh, bog, beach, flat or other
contiguous lowland subject to tidal action during the highest astronomical tide as
determined by the United States Department of Commerce, National Oceanic and
Atmospheric Administration.
Coastal wetlands may include portions of coastal sand dunes.
Page 1 - 132LR0163(03)